apertium-ara-heb.heb.dix
    <pardef n="גי/ס__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l>ס</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ס</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סי</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סנו</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סך</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סך</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סכם</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סכן</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סן</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סו</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סה</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סם</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יסות</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סים</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סות</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סי</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיי</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיי</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותינו</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סינו</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיך</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיך</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותייך</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סייך</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיכם</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיכם</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיכן</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיהן</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיכן</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיהן</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיו</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיו</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיה</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיה</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סותיהם</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>סיהם</l><r>ס<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="סכי/ן__n_f">
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ני</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ננו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נך</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נכן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נן</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נה</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נם</l><r>ן<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="עורר__n_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ים</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ין</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="cons"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יי</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ינו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ייך</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יכן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהן</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יו</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יה</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>יהם</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <pardef n="S__גזזת" c="Possessive suffixes (mine, theirs, …) for feminine nouns">
      <!-- used by several _f pardefs below, TODO check if all of the actually work with this pardef! -->
      <e><p>          <l></l><r></r></p></e> <!-- pass-through -->
      <e><p>          <l>י</l><r><s n="px1sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>נו</l><r><s n="px1pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="px2sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ך</l><r><s n="px2sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כם</l><r><s n="px2pl_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>כן</l><r><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ן</l><r><s n="px2pl_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ו</l><r><s n="px3sg_m"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ה</l><r><s n="px3sg_f"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ם</l><r><s n="px3pl_m"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <e lm="דופן"><par n="ה"/><i>דופ</i><par n="סכי/ן__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="נימוס"><par n="ה"/><i>נימוס</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="לשון"><par n="ה"/><i>לשו</i><par n="סכי/ן__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="קידוש"><par n="ה"/><i>קידוש</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גירוש"><par n="ה"/><i>גירוש</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="גיס"><par n="ה"/><i>גי</i><par n="גי/ס__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="זיקוק"><par n="ה"/><i>זיקוק</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="מהדר"><par n="ה"/><i>מהדר</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="עורר"><par n="ה"/><i>עורר</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="חידוד"><par n="ה"/><i>חידוד</i><par n="עורר__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="סכין"><par n="ה"/><i>סכי</i><par n="סכי/ן__n_f"/></e>
